Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1184.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State-mandated Benefit Moratorium Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Legislative Budget and Finance Committee."Health care provider." A health care facility, medical equipment supplier or person that is licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth or another state.12345678910111213141516171819 "Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term includes:(i) A dental only policy.(ii) A vision only policy.(3) The term does not include:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) Supplement Policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A workers' compensation policy.(x) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(xi) A homeowner's insurance policy.(xii) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."Insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as 20250HB1184PN1333 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV of The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."State-mandated health benefit." As follows:(1) A benefit that requires a health insurance policy to do any of the following:(i) Provide coverage or increase the amount of coverage for the treatment of a particular disease, condition or other health care need that exceeds Federal requirements.(ii) Provide coverage or increase the amount of coverage of equipment, supplies or drugs used in connection with a health care treatment or service that exceed Federal requirements.(iii) Provide coverage for care delivered by a specific type of provider.(iv) Require a particular benefit design or impose limitations or restrictions on deductibles, coinsurance, copayments or any annual or lifetime maximum benefit amounts.(v) Impose limits or conditions on a contract between an insurer and a health care provider.(2) The term does not include coverage that is mandated by Federal law or amends the scope of practice of a licensed health care professional.20250HB1184PN1333 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Mandated health benefit moratorium.Until submission to the General Assembly of the report required under section 5, a moratorium is established during which the General Assembly may not consider or act on any new or expanded coverage under a health insurance policy.Section 4. Construction.Nothing in this act shall be construed to:(1) Prohibit an employer or insurer from electing to provide new or expanded coverage under a health insurance policy.(2) Prohibit changes in coverage requirements to comply with Federal law.Section 5. Report of existing mandated benefits.(a) Authorization.--The committee shall evaluate State-mandated health benefits and the cost to employers and individuals and shall issue a report to the General Assembly in accordance with this section.(b) Contents.--The report under this section must contain the following:(1) A list of each existing State-mandated health benefit placed upon insurers in this Commonwealth.(2) The fiscal impact of each existing State-mandated health benefit on the premiums for health insurance policy coverage in this Commonwealth.(3) Whether the existing State-mandated health benefits will result in the Commonwealth being required to make payments to defray the cost under 42 U.S.C. § 18031(d)(3) (relating to affordable choices for health benefit plans) and 45 CFR 155.170 (relating to additional required benefits), as amended.20250HB1184PN1333 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The social, financial and medical efficacy of each State-mandated health benefit.(c) Issuance.--Not later than December 31, 2026, the committee shall submit the report required under this section, which contains its findings and any recommendations, to:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Banking and Insurance Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Insurance Committee of the House of Representatives.(d) Notice.--Upon the submittal of the report under this section, the committee shall transmit notice of the submittal of the report to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1184PN1333 - 5 - 12345678910111213141516171819